Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-103 Mass merchandising authorized.
An insurer may mass merchandise motor vehicle, property and casualty insurance
to the employees of any employer under a mass merchandising plan audited by the
commissioner; provided that such mass merchandising is agreed to by the
employer. An employer may contract with one or more insurers for mass
merchandising of motor vehicle, property and casualty insurance to its
employees. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next